Utah statutes.
59-2-330.   Campers -- Registration certificates and decals obtained from
county assessor -- Contents of certificates.
(1)  Numbered camper registration certificates and camper decals shall be
obtained at no cost from the county assessor of the county where the camper
has situs for purposes of taxation after it is assessed and the property tax
paid.
(2)  Certificates of registration shall contain the name and address of the
owner of the camper, its make, model and identification number; and statement
of any liens or encumbrances together with any other information deemed
necessary.
